dict-sq/sq_ALN.aff
# Copyright 2018, 20?? Arifi Gazmen
#
# E-Mail: ???@hotmail.com
#
# Version 0.1 (2018.11.12) 
#
# This file is distributed under GPL license
#
# This file is part of the Albanian dictionary.
#
# The Albanian Gheg dictionary is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published
# by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# The Albanian dictionary is distributed in the hope that it will be
# useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
# GPL license can be found here:
# http://www.fsf.org/licenses/licenses.html

SET UTF-8 #SET ISO8859-1

TRY aâäãbcçddeëêẽfghiĩjklmnoôöõpqrstuũvwxyỹzAÂÄÃBCÇDDEËÊẼFGHIĨJKLMNOÔÖÕPQRSTUŨVWXYỸZ

###########
# TESTING #
###########

SFX Geg Y 9                         #LET = LETTER'S.
SFX Geg      0    a            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
SFX Geg      0    ë            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
SFX Geg      0    e            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {e : epsilon n°5 I.P.A. [e]).
SFX Geg      0    ê            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {ê : êta n°8 I.P.A. [?]).
SFX Geg      0    i            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {i : iôta n°10 I.P.A. [i]).
SFX Geg      0    o            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {o : iôta n°10 I.P.A. [o]).
SFX Geg      0    u            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {u : upsilon n°10 I.P.A. [u]).
SFX Geg      0    y            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {y : ypsilon n°10 I.P.A. [y]).
SFX Geg      0    ô            .    #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi {ô : ômega n°1000 I.P.A. [?]).

SFX Um Y 2
SFX Um       0    um           . #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
SFX Um       0    uam          . #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.

SFX Us Y 2
SFX Us       0    us           . #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi.
SFX Us       0    ues          . #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi.

SFX Verbone Y 2
SFX Verbone 0   oj          .   #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi.
SFX Verbone 0   ojna        .   #SUFFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi.

PFX Prefix Y 14
PFX Prefix   0    ad‑          . {#PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi. Action, before any term's.#}
PFX Prefix   0    ç'           . {#PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Action, before any term's.#}
PFX Prefix   0    de‑          . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Action, before any term's.
PFX Prefix   0    dis‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi. Action, before any term's.
PFX Prefix   0    kol‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Before a "L".
PFX Prefix   0    kom‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Before ""
PFX Prefix   0    kon‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi. Before ""
PFX Prefix   0    pa‑          . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Privation, probably vrom Latin PASSUS.
PFX Prefix   0    për‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
PFX Prefix   0    pre‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
PFX Prefix   0    pro‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-15 by Gazmen Arifi.
PFX Prefix   0    re‑          . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.
PFX Prefix   0    s'           . #PREXIF : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi. Negation, vrom Latin SE-.
PFX Prefix   0    sym‑         . #PREFIX : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi.

REP 58
REP a ë
REP ë a
REP ë e
REP e ë
REP u y
REP y u
REP i y
REP y i
# REP u ua          #Replacement : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi (remove Tosk wrong rule).
# REP u ue          #Replacement : edit of 2018-11-13 by Gazmen Arifi (remove Tosk wrong rule).
REP y ye
REP c ç
REP ç c
REP ç q
REP q ç
REP i j
REP j i
REP i ij
REP ij i
REP d t
REP t d
REP g gj
REP j nj
REP gj xh
REP xh gj
REP s z
REP z s
REP sh ç
REP ç sh
REP z zh
REP zh z
REP ç sh
REP sh ç
#PREFIX
REP ^kom-p komp             #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^komp kom-p             #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^kom- kom               #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^kom kom-               #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^pap pa‑p               #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP simp sym‑               #Prefix 2018-11-13 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^jn in                   #Prefix 2018-11-15 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ^in jn                   #Prefix 2018-11-15 Edit by Gazmen Arifi.
REP ç zh
REP zh ç
REP d dt
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP r rr
REP rr r
REP eshte ãshthë
REP është ãshthë
REP kan kanë
REP jan janë
REP këtë kête
REP këtë kêt
REP kte këtë
REP ktë këtë
REP kt këtë
REP keti këtij
REP këtij kti
REP këto kto

BREAK 8
BREAK ^-
BREAK -$
BREAK ‑
BREAK ^‑
BREAK ‑$
BREAK ‑
BREAK ^‑‑
BREAK ‑‑$
